North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 2. Prison Regulations.

§ 148-11.
Authority to adopt rules; authority to designate uniforms. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall adopt rules for the government of the State prison system. The Secretary shall have the rules that pertain to enforcing discipline read to every prisoner when received in the State prison system and a printed copy of these rules made available to the prisoners.

The Secretary of Public Safety has sole authority to designate the uniforms worn by inmates confined in the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 15; Code, s. 3444; Rev., s. 5401; C.S., s. 7721; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 4; 1957, c. 349, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, ss. 14, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1983, c. 147, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 15; c. 477, ss. 6, 8; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(u); 1999-109, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i), (j); 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeee).

Cross References.

As to the authority of agencies to adopt rules, see Article 2A of Chapter 150B.

§ 148-11.
Authority to adopt rules; authority to designate uniforms. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall adopt rules for the government of the State prison system. The Secretary shall have the rules that pertain to enforcing discipline read to every prisoner when received in the State prison system and a printed copy of these rules made available to the prisoners.

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction has sole authority to designate the uniforms worn by inmates confined in the Division of Prisons.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 15; Code, s. 3444; Rev., s. 5401; C.S., s. 7721; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 4; 1957, c. 349, s. 4; 1967, c. 996, ss. 14, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1983, c. 147, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 15; c. 477, ss. 6, 8; 1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(u); 1999-109, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i), (j); 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeee); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (r).

Cross References.

As to the authority of agencies to adopt rules, see Article 2A of Chapter 150B.

§ 148-12.
Diagnostic and classification programs. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall, as soon as practicable, establish diagnostic centers to make social, medical, and psychological studies of persons committed to the Division. Full diagnostic studies shall be made before initial classification in cases where such studies have not been made.

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33, effective July 1, 1978.

Any prisoner confined in the State prison system while under a sentence of imprisonment imposed upon conviction of a felony shall be classified and treated as a convicted felon even if, before beginning service of the felony sentence, such prisoner has time remaining to be served in the State prison system on a sentence or sentences imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors.

History.

1917, c. 278, s. 2; 1919, c. 191, s. 2; C.S., s. 7750; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 5; 1959, c. 50; 1967, c. 996, s. 2; 1973, c. 1446, s. 27; 1977, c. 711, s. 33; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(fffffff).

§ 148-12.
Diagnostic and classification programs. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Corrections shall, as soon as practicable, establish diagnostic centers to make social, medical, and psychological studies of persons committed to the Division. Full diagnostic studies shall be made before initial classification in cases where such studies have not been made.

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33, effective July 1, 1978.

Any prisoner confined in the State prison system while under a sentence of imprisonment imposed upon conviction of a felony shall be classified and treated as a convicted felon even if, before beginning service of the felony sentence, such prisoner has time remaining to be served in the State prison system on a sentence or sentences imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors.

History.

1917, c. 278, s. 2; 1919, c. 191, s. 2; C.S., s. 7750; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 5; 1959, c. 50; 1967, c. 996, s. 2; 1973, c. 1446, s. 27; 1977, c. 711, s. 33; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(fffffff); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 148-13.
Regulations as to custody grades, privileges, gain time credit, etc. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of Public Safety may issue regulations regarding the grades of custody in which State prisoners are kept, the privileges and restrictions applicable to each custody grade, and the amount of cash, clothing, etc., to be awarded to State prisoners after their discharge or parole. The amount of cash awarded to a prisoner upon discharge or parole after being incarcerated for two years or longer shall be at least forty-five dollars ($45.00).

(a1)

The Secretary of Public Safety shall adopt rules to specify the rates at, and circumstances under, which earned time authorized by

G.S. 15A-1340.13(d)

and G.S. 15A-1340.20(d) may be earned or forfeited by persons serving activated sentences of imprisonment for felony or misdemeanor convictions. Such rules shall include any person serving an activated sentence of imprisonment who is confined in a detention facility approved by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

With respect to prisoners who are serving sentences for impaired driving offenses under

G.S. 20-138.1

, the Secretary of Public Safety may, in his discretion, issue regulations regarding deductions of time from the terms of such prisoners for good behavior, meritorious conduct, work or study, participation in rehabilitation programs, and the like.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 538, s. 32, effective January 1, 1995.

(e)

The Secretary’s regulations concerning earned time and good time credits authorized by this section shall be distributed to and followed by local jail administrators and by personnel of the Juvenile Justice Section or personnel approved by the Juvenile Justice Section with regard to sentenced jail prisoners, including prisoners housed in a detention facility approved by the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

(f)

The provisions of this section do not apply to persons sentenced to a term of special probation under G.S. 15A-1344(e) or G.S. 15A-1351(a).

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 23; 1935, c. 414, s. 15; 1937, c. 88, s. 1; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 6; 1979, c. 760, s. 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, ss. 43-47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; c. 662, ss. 8, 9; 1983, c. 560, s. 3; 1985, c. 310, ss. 1-4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 120(a); 1991, c. 187, s. 3; 1993, c. 538, s. 32; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2014-100, s. 16C.1(e); 2020-83, s. 8(l).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-13

.

§ 148-13.
Regulations as to custody grades, privileges, gain time credit, etc. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may issue regulations regarding the grades of custody in which State prisoners are kept, the privileges and restrictions applicable to each custody grade, and the amount of cash, clothing, etc., to be awarded to State prisoners after their discharge or parole. The amount of cash awarded to a prisoner upon discharge or parole after being incarcerated for two years or longer shall be at least forty-five dollars ($45.00).

(a1)

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall adopt rules to specify the rates at, and circumstances under, which earned time authorized by

G.S. 15A-1340.13(d)

and G.S. 15A-1340.20(d) may be earned or forfeited by persons serving activated sentences of imprisonment for felony or misdemeanor convictions. Such rules shall include any person serving an activated sentence of imprisonment who is confined in a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

With respect to prisoners who are serving sentences for impaired driving offenses under

G.S. 20-138.1

, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may, in the Secretary’s discretion, issue regulations regarding deductions of time from the terms of such prisoners for good behavior, meritorious conduct, work or study, participation in rehabilitation programs, and the like.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 538, s. 32, effective January 1, 1995.

(e)

The Secretary’s regulations concerning earned time and good time credits authorized by this section shall be distributed to and followed by local jail administrators and by personnel of the Division of Juvenile Justice or personnel approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice with regard to sentenced jail prisoners, including prisoners housed in a detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice.

(f)

The provisions of this section do not apply to persons sentenced to a term of special probation under G.S. 15A-1344(e) or G.S. 15A-1351(a).

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 23; 1935, c. 414, s. 15; 1937, c. 88, s. 1; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 6; 1979, c. 760, s. 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, ss. 43-47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; c. 662, ss. 8, 9; 1983, c. 560, s. 3; 1985, c. 310, ss. 1-4; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 120(a); 1991, c. 187, s. 3; 1993, c. 538, s. 32; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2014-100, s. 16C.1(e); 2020-83, s. 8(l); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(dddd).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-13

.

§§ 148-14 through 148-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 409.

§ 148-18.
Wages, allowances and loans. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Prisoners employed by Correction Enterprises shall be compensated as set forth in Article 14 of this Chapter. Prisoners participating in work assignments established by the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be compensated at rates fixed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety’s rules and regulations; provided, that no prisoner so paid shall receive more than one dollar ($1.00) per day, unless the Secretary determines that the work assignment requires special skills or training. Upon approval of the Secretary, inmates working in job assignments requiring special skills or training may be paid up to three dollars ($3.00) per day. The Correction Enterprises Fund shall be the source of wages and allowances provided to inmates who are employed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in work assignments established by the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice.

A prisoner shall be required to contribute to the support of any of his dependents residing in North Carolina who may be receiving public assistance during the period of commitment if funds available to the prisoner are adequate for such purpose. The dependency status and need shall be determined by the department of social services in the county of North Carolina in which such dependents reside.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 233, s. 2.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 19; 1967, c. 996, s. 3; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 506, s. 3; c. 716, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 5; 1993, c. 321, s. 175; 1995, c. 233, s. 2; 2007-280, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (j); 2017-186, ss. 2(ggggggg), 3(a).

§ 148-18.
Wages, allowances and loans. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Prisoners employed by Correction Enterprises shall be compensated as set forth in Article 14 of this Chapter. Prisoners participating in work assignments established by the Division of Prisons shall be compensated at rates fixed by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction’s rules and regulations; provided, that no prisoner so paid shall receive more than one dollar ($1.00) per day, unless the Secretary determines that the work assignment requires special skills or training. Upon approval of the Secretary, inmates working in job assignments requiring special skills or training may be paid up to three dollars ($3.00) per day. The Correction Enterprises Fund shall be the source of wages and allowances provided to inmates who are employed by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in work assignments established by the Division of Prisons.

A prisoner shall be required to contribute to the support of any of his dependents residing in North Carolina who may be receiving public assistance during the period of commitment if funds available to the prisoner are adequate for such purpose. The dependency status and need shall be determined by the department of social services in the county of North Carolina in which such dependents reside.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 233, s. 2.

History.

1935, c. 414, s. 19; 1967, c. 996, s. 3; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, c. 506, s. 3; c. 716, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 5; 1993, c. 321, s. 175; 1995, c. 233, s. 2; 2007-280, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (j); 2017-186, ss. 2(ggggggg), 3(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), (r).

§ 148-18.1.
Confiscation of unauthorized articles. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any item of personal property which a prisoner in any correctional facility is prohibited from possessing by State law or which is not authorized by rules adopted by the Secretary of Public Safety shall, when found in the possession of a prisoner, be confiscated and destroyed or otherwise disposed of as the Secretary may direct. Any unauthorized funds confiscated under this section or funds from the sale of confiscated property shall be deposited to Inmate Welfare Fund maintained by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

1983, c. 289, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhh).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the second sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-18.1.
Confiscation of unauthorized articles. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any item of personal property which a prisoner in any correctional facility is prohibited from possessing by State law or which is not authorized by rules adopted by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall, when found in the possession of a prisoner, be confiscated and destroyed or otherwise disposed of as the Secretary may direct. Any unauthorized funds confiscated under this section or funds from the sale of confiscated property shall be deposited to Inmate Welfare Fund maintained by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1983, c. 289, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhh); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the second sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-19.
Health services. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules, and regulations of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall prescribe standards for health services to prisoners, which shall include preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic measures on both an outpatient and a hospital basis, for all types of patients. A prisoner may be taken, when necessary, to a medical facility outside the State prison system. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall seek the cooperation of public and private agencies, institutions, officials, and individuals in the development of adequate health services to prisoners.

Upon request of the Secretary of Public Safety, the Secretary of Health and Human Services may detail personnel employed by the Department of Health and Human Services to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of supervising and furnishing medical, psychiatric, psychological, dental, and other technical and scientific services to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The compensation, allowances, and expenses of the personnel detailed under this section may be paid from applicable appropriations to the Department of Health and Human Services, and may be reimbursed from applicable appropriations to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Secretary of Public Safety may make similar arrangements with any other agency of State government able and willing to aid the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to meet the needs of prisoners for health services.

Each prisoner committed to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall receive a physical and mental examination by a health care professional authorized by the North Carolina Medical Board to perform the examinations as soon as practicable after admission and before being assigned to work. The prisoner’s work and other assignments shall be made with due regard for the prisoner’s physical and mental condition.

The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall adopt standards for the delivery of mental health and intellectual and other developmental disability services to inmates in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall give the Secretary of Public Safety an opportunity to review and comment on proposed standards prior to promulgation of the standards; however, final authority to determine the standards remains with the Commission. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall designate an agency or agencies within the Department of Health and Human Services to monitor the implementation by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety of these standards and of substance abuse standards adopted by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 22; C.S., s. 7727; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 4; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 332; c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 6; c. 707, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 55.1; 1991, c. 405, s. 1; 1995, c. 94, s. 36; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-266, s. 1.17(b); 2012-83, s. 61; 2013-360, s. 12A.12; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiii); 2019-76, s. 28.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-19

.

Telemedicine Pilot Program for Inmates.

Session Laws
2019-135, s. 6(a)-(d), provides: “(a) By August 1, 2019, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety on the feasibility study of telehealth services referenced in the February 2019 Memorandum of Agreement between the Department and UNC Health Care.

“(b) The Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall establish a telemedicine pilot program to provide physical health services to inmates in remote correctional facilities. The pilot program shall be established with consideration of the results of the study referenced in subsection (a) of this section. The goal of the pilot program is to assess whether the use of telemedicine decreases costs for inmate transportation, custody, and outside providers while improving access to care. While designing the telemedicine pilot program, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall consult UNC Health Care; the 2012 University of North Carolina, Kenan-Flagler Business School report on telemedicine; and Finding 6, Report Number 2018-08, from the Joint Legislative Program Evaluation Oversight Committee. The telemedicine pilot program shall initially be established in two correctional facilities serving male inmates. One pilot site shall be located in a correctional facility in the eastern portion of the State and one pilot site shall be located in a correctional facility in the western portion of the State. The pilot program design must connect the two correctional facility pilot sites with the Central Prison Healthcare Complex and its contracted providers’ facilities and shall be operational on or before January 1, 2020.

“(c) The ability to assess, measure, and evaluate the telemedicine pilot program shall be integral to the pilot program design. Assessment of the pilot program shall include, but is not limited to, the following measures for each correctional facility pilot site:

“(1) Number and cost of telemedicine encounters by service area.

“(2) Comparison of the number and cost of telemedicine encounters, by service area, to:

“a. The number of in-person encounters provided the previous year to inmates housed at that facility; and

“b. The number of in-person encounters provided during the pilot period at similar correctional facilities not participating in the pilot.

“(3) Comparison of the number of days lapsed between referral date and treatment date, by service area, to:

“a. The number of days lapsed the previous year in that facility; and

“b. The number of days lapsed during the pilot period at similar correctional facilities not participating in the pilot.

“(4) Amount of inmate transportation and custody costs avoided from receiving telemedicine.

“(5) Amount of provider transportation costs avoided from providing telemedicine.

“(6) Cost of initial telemedicine equipment and other related costs with descriptions.

“(7) Obstacles and concerns related to expanding telemedicine to other correctional facilities.

“(d) On or before January 1, 2020, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall provide an interim report on the assessment criteria outlined in subsection (c) of this section, including any additional findings and recommendations, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services. On or before January 1, 2021, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the assessment criteria outlined in subsection (c) of this section, including any additional findings, and shall make recommendations on whether to expand the telemedicine pilot program to additional sites, including accompanying costs and anticipated savings, and recommendations on which correctional facilities would be most advantageous to include in the pilot due to lack of access or costs associated with transportation and custody.”

Nurse Staffing at State Prisons Report.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.5(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Public Safety shall report the following information to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety by February 1, 2022, and by February 1, 2023:

“(1) The total number of permanent nursing positions allocated to the Department, the number of filled positions, the number of positions that have been vacant for more than six months, and information regarding the location of both filled and vacant positions.

“(2) The extent to which temporary contract services are being used to staff vacant nursing positions, the method for funding the contract services, and any cost differences between the use of permanent employees versus contract employees.

“(3) A progress report on the implementation of its plan to (i) reduce the use of contract services to provide nursing in State prisons and (ii) attract and retain qualified nurses for employment in permanent positions in State prisons.

“(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Public Safety may, in its discretion and subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, convert funds appropriated for contractual nursing services to permanent nursing positions when it is determined to promote security, generate cost savings, and improve health care quality. The Department shall report on any such conversions to the Fiscal Research Division.”

§ 148-19.
Health services. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules, and regulations of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall prescribe standards for health services to prisoners, which shall include preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic measures on both an outpatient and a hospital basis, for all types of patients. A prisoner may be taken, when necessary, to a medical facility outside the State prison system. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall seek the cooperation of public and private agencies, institutions, officials, and individuals in the development of adequate health services to prisoners.

Upon request of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, the Secretary of Health and Human Services may detail personnel employed by the Department of Health and Human Services to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for the purpose of supervising and furnishing medical, psychiatric, psychological, dental, and other technical and scientific services to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The compensation, allowances, and expenses of the personnel detailed under this section may be paid from applicable appropriations to the Department of Health and Human Services, and may be reimbursed from applicable appropriations to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may make similar arrangements with any other agency of State government able and willing to aid the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to meet the needs of prisoners for health services.

Each prisoner committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall receive a physical and mental examination by a health care professional authorized by the North Carolina Medical Board to perform the examinations as soon as practicable after admission and before being assigned to work. The prisoner’s work and other assignments shall be made with due regard for the prisoner’s physical and mental condition.

The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall adopt standards for the delivery of mental health and intellectual and other developmental disability services to inmates in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. The Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall give the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction an opportunity to review and comment on proposed standards prior to promulgation of the standards; however, final authority to determine the standards remains with the Commission. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall designate an agency or agencies within the Department of Health and Human Services to monitor the implementation by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction of these standards and of substance abuse standards adopted by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 22; C.S., s. 7727; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 4; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 332; c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 6; c. 707, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 589, s. 55.1; 1991, c. 405, s. 1; 1995, c. 94, s. 36; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2011-266, s. 1.17(b); 2012-83, s. 61; 2013-360, s. 12A.12; 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiii); 2019-76, s. 28; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-19

.

Telemedicine Pilot Program for Inmates.

Session Laws
2019-135, s. 6(a)-(d), provides: “(a) By August 1, 2019, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety on the feasibility study of telehealth services referenced in the February 2019 Memorandum of Agreement between the Department and UNC Health Care.

“(b) The Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall establish a telemedicine pilot program to provide physical health services to inmates in remote correctional facilities. The pilot program shall be established with consideration of the results of the study referenced in subsection (a) of this section. The goal of the pilot program is to assess whether the use of telemedicine decreases costs for inmate transportation, custody, and outside providers while improving access to care. While designing the telemedicine pilot program, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall consult UNC Health Care; the 2012 University of North Carolina, Kenan-Flagler Business School report on telemedicine; and Finding 6, Report Number 2018-08, from the Joint Legislative Program Evaluation Oversight Committee. The telemedicine pilot program shall initially be established in two correctional facilities serving male inmates. One pilot site shall be located in a correctional facility in the eastern portion of the State and one pilot site shall be located in a correctional facility in the western portion of the State. The pilot program design must connect the two correctional facility pilot sites with the Central Prison Healthcare Complex and its contracted providers’ facilities and shall be operational on or before January 1, 2020.

“(c) The ability to assess, measure, and evaluate the telemedicine pilot program shall be integral to the pilot program design. Assessment of the pilot program shall include, but is not limited to, the following measures for each correctional facility pilot site:

“(1) Number and cost of telemedicine encounters by service area.

“(2) Comparison of the number and cost of telemedicine encounters, by service area, to:

“a. The number of in-person encounters provided the previous year to inmates housed at that facility; and

“b. The number of in-person encounters provided during the pilot period at similar correctional facilities not participating in the pilot.

“(3) Comparison of the number of days lapsed between referral date and treatment date, by service area, to:

“a. The number of days lapsed the previous year in that facility; and

“b. The number of days lapsed during the pilot period at similar correctional facilities not participating in the pilot.

“(4) Amount of inmate transportation and custody costs avoided from receiving telemedicine.

“(5) Amount of provider transportation costs avoided from providing telemedicine.

“(6) Cost of initial telemedicine equipment and other related costs with descriptions.

“(7) Obstacles and concerns related to expanding telemedicine to other correctional facilities.

“(d) On or before January 1, 2020, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall provide an interim report on the assessment criteria outlined in subsection (c) of this section, including any additional findings and recommendations, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services. On or before January 1, 2021, the Department of Public Safety, Health Services Section, shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the assessment criteria outlined in subsection (c) of this section, including any additional findings, and shall make recommendations on whether to expand the telemedicine pilot program to additional sites, including accompanying costs and anticipated savings, and recommendations on which correctional facilities would be most advantageous to include in the pilot due to lack of access or costs associated with transportation and custody.”

Nurse Staffing at State Prisons Report.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 19C.5(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Public Safety shall report the following information to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety by February 1, 2022, and by February 1, 2023:

“(1) The total number of permanent nursing positions allocated to the Department, the number of filled positions, the number of positions that have been vacant for more than six months, and information regarding the location of both filled and vacant positions.

“(2) The extent to which temporary contract services are being used to staff vacant nursing positions, the method for funding the contract services, and any cost differences between the use of permanent employees versus contract employees.

“(3) A progress report on the implementation of its plan to (i) reduce the use of contract services to provide nursing in State prisons and (ii) attract and retain qualified nurses for employment in permanent positions in State prisons.

“(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Public Safety may, in its discretion and subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, convert funds appropriated for contractual nursing services to permanent nursing positions when it is determined to promote security, generate cost savings, and improve health care quality. The Department shall report on any such conversions to the Fiscal Research Division.”